Utah statutes.
22-2-1.   Death of trustee -- Trust estate vests in successor.
Upon the death of a sole or surviving trustee of an express trust the trust
estate does not descend to his heirs or pass to his personal representatives,
but shall by virtue hereof, upon the appointment and qualification of a
successor to such trustee, become immediately vested in such successor in
trust.
